test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sikak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sikâk - ok : # -k final animate noun 'goose'
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg: sikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl: sikâkwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Loc: sikâkohk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: sikâkosis
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: sikâkosisak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: sikâkosisihk

     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisikâkom
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisikâkom
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkoma
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisikâkominân
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisikâkominaw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisikâkomiwâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkomiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa

     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisikâkomak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisikâkomak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkoma
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisikâkominânak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisikâkominawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisikâkomiwâwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkomiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa

     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisikâkosisim
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisikâkosisim
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkosisima
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: osikâkosisimiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisikâkosisiminân
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisikâkosisiminaw
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisikâkosisimiwâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkosisimiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: osikâkosisimiyiwa
 
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisikâkosisimak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisikâkosisimak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkosisima
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: osikâkosisimiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisikâkosisiminânak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisikâkosisiminawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisikâkosisimiwâwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkosisimiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: osikâkosisimiyiwa
     
     sikâk+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisikâkomihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisikâkomihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osikâkomihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: osikâkomiyihk 
     sikâk+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisikâkominâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisikâkominâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisikâkomiwâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osikâkomiwâhk 
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: osikâkomiyihk

     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisikâkosisimihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisikâkosisimihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osikâkosisimihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: osikâkosisimiyihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisikâkosisiminâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisikâkosisiminâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisikâkosisimiwâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osikâkosisimiwâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: osikâkosisimiyihk
